Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-368
Nebraska State Patrol; carrier enforcement division; adopt rules and regulations; prior rules and regulations; effect.

(1) The Nebraska State Patrol or the carrier enforcement division may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out and enforce sections 75-362 to 75-369.07.

(2) The rules and regulations utilized by the Public Service Commission to administer any function or duty transferred to the Division of Motor Carrier Services on January 1, 1997, shall be administered as if adopted by the Division of Motor Carrier Services and shall remain effective until repealed, amended, modified, or reenacted by the Division of Motor Carrier Services.

Laws 1986, LB 301, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 61;

Laws 2003, LB 480, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 1007, § 16.